District of Columbia statutes.
47-387.51

Maintenance of Effort and Matching funds inclusion in budget.

Beginning with the Fiscal Year 2003 Proposed Budget and Financial Plan, the Chief Financial Officer shall certify to the Council that the Mayor has included in the proposed budget and financial plan the amounts necessary to meet and maintain the local requirements for Maintenance of Effort and Matching funds and the certification shall be included in the proposed budget and financial plan submitted by the Mayor to the Council.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4802, 48 DCR 6981
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 79(a), 51 DCR 881
D.C. Law 15-105 validated previously made technical corrections.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4302 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).